Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.340

Elections in certain first-class school districts.

(1) In each county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more, first-class school districts containing a city of the first-class shall hold their elections biennially as provided in RCW 29A.04.330.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 28A.343.610, the directors to be elected may be elected for terms of six years and until their successors are elected, qualified, and assume office in accordance with *RCW 29A.20.040.

(3) If the board of directors of a school district pursuant to subsection (1) of this section reduces the length of the term of office for school directors in the district from six to four years, the reduction in the length of term must not affect the term of office of any incumbent director without his or her consent, and a provision must be made to appropriately stagger future elections of school directors.

[ 2009 c 107 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 29A.20.040 was recodified as RCW 29A.60.280 pursuant to 2013 c 11 s 93.

Retroactive application—2009 c 107 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Effective date—2009 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.